Massachusetts, session 194th, H810.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 51 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 1F the
following section:–
Section 1G. (a) As used in this section the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“municipal election”, an election for mayor, school committee, city council, town
council, board of selectmen, select board elections, a school committee referendum, a local ballot
referendum or other municipal elections.
“noncitizen voter”, a person 18 years of age or older with legal immigration status who is
not a citizen of the United States.
of 3

“noncitizen voting limitations”, a noncitizen voter’s inability to vote for: (1) the office of
President, Vice President, Presidential elector, Member of the Senate or Member of the House of
Representatives pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 611; (2) a state office; or (3) initiative petitions authorized
under article XLVIII of the constitution.
“noncitizen voter registration form”, a voter registration form that only a noncitizen voter
uses.
“noncitizen voting rights”, a noncitizen voter’s right to: (1) vote in a municipal election;
(2) participate in a town meeting; and (3) be a candidate and serve, if duly elected, in a municipal
elected office.
“town meeting”, an open town meeting or a representative town meeting established
pursuant to chapter 43A.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of chapter 51 or any other general or
special law to the contrary, a municipal election official shall enter a noncitizen voter’s name on
a list of noncitizen voters upon the noncitizen voter’s submission of a noncitizen voter
registration form. Within 5 days of entering the noncitizen voter’s name on the list, the municipal
election officer shall notify the noncitizen voter: (1) of the noncitizen voting rights; (2) of the
noncitizen voting limitations; and (3) that voting in a federal election may jeopardize the
noncitizen’s application for United States citizenship.
(c) For as long as the noncitizen voter remains a resident of the town in which the
noncitizen voter has registered to vote, the noncitizen voter may exercise the noncitizen voting
rights. A noncitizen voter shall only remain registered to vote in one municipality at a time.
of 3

(d) The state secretary shall issue a noncitizen voter registration form. The voter
registration form shall include a declaration to be signed under pains and penalties of perjury by
the noncitizen voter that the noncitizen is a resident of the municipality in which the noncitizen
voter desires to vote.
(e) The state secretary and the election officer of a municipality shall disseminate the
noncitizen voter registration form at the same places and in the same manner that the state
secretary and election officer of a municipality disseminate the voter registration form for a
United States citizen.
(f) The state secretary shall issue regulations to implement this section.
of 3